Alaska statutes. Title 44. State Government.
Chapter 07. Alaska Capital City Development Corporation.

Revisor’s notes. —

Section 1, ch. 143, SLA 1978 added a new chapter, designated AS 44.63 and renumbered in 1978 as AS 44.07. Chapter 143, however, had a conditional effective date and that condition has never been met. Section 7, ch. 143, SLA 1978 provided that the Act would take “effect 30 days after certification that a bond issue for costs of relocation of the capital has been adopted by the voters of the state.” In November 1978, the voters rejected a bond issue for costs of relocation of the capital. Chapter 54, SLA 1981, placed a ballot question before the voters related to the relocation of the capital. At the November 1982 general election that ballot measure failed, and by the conditions of ch. 54, SLA 1981 all other provisions related to capital relocation were repealed. The failure to include the repeal of ch. 143, SLA 1978 may have been intentional, because the law had not gone into effect and, therefore, did not need to be repealed. All other provisions of the Alaska Statutes that would have been affected by ch. 143, SLA 1978 have subsequently been repealed or amended by the legislature. For the text of the law enacted by ch. 143, SLA 1978, see either the 1980 or 1984 pamphlets for this title, or the 1978 Session Laws of Alaska.